Utah statutes.
20A-3-702.   Election day voting center -- Hours of operations -- Compliance with Election Code.

(1)  An election officer may operate an election day voting center in one or more locations designated under Section 20A-3-703.

(2)  An election officer shall provide for voting at an election day voting center by:

(a)  regular ballot if:

(i)  the election day voting center is designated under Section 20A-5-403 as the polling place for the voting precinct in which the voter resides; and

(ii)  the voter is eligible to vote using a regular ballot in accordance with this title;

(b)  voting center ballot if:

(i)  the election day voting center is not designated under Section 20A-5-403 as the polling place for the voting precinct in which the voter resides;

(ii)  the voter resides within the political subdivision holding the election; and

(iii)  the voter is otherwise eligible to vote using a regular ballot in accordance with this title; or

(c)  provisional ballot if the voter is only eligible to vote using a provisional ballot in accordance with this title.

(3)  An election officer shall ensure that an election day voting center:

(a)  is open on election day during the time period specified under Section 20A-1-302;

(b)  allows an eligible voter to vote if the voter:

(i)  resides within the political subdivision holding an election; and

(ii)  arrives at the election day voting center by the designated closing time in accordance with Section 20A-1-302; and

(c)  is administered according to the requirements of this title.



Enacted by Chapter 291, 2011 General Session

